Illinois, session 104th, HB5434.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Emerging Adult Criminal Justice Task Force Act.  6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7        (1) Emerging adults are disproportionately involved in 8    the criminal justice system. National data consistently 9    show that individuals in this age group have the highest 10    rates of arrest, jail admissions, prison admissions, and 11    rearrest.12        (2) Developmental psychology and neuroscience studies 13    have shown that judgment, impulse control, and 14    psychosocial maturity may continue developing into the 15    mid-20s. Emerging adults may differ significantly from 16    older adults in risk assessment, susceptibility to peer 17    influence, emotional regulation, and decision-making under 18    stress.19        (3) Emerging adults may also face elevated rates of 20    mental health disorders, trauma exposure, substance use 21    disorders, unemployment, and housing instability. These 22    vulnerabilities are closely linked to system involvement.23        (4) Despite these challenges, emerging adults possess   HB5434 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 16800 WRO 30209 b1    strong capacity for change. Their brains retain high 2    neuroplasticity, and appropriate interventions during this 3    developmental period produce greater long-term benefits 4    than comparable interventions for older adults.5        (5) Traditional adult criminal justice responses can 6    be counterproductive for emerging adults. Adult jails and 7    prisons can be associated with higher rates of 8    victimization, self-harm, long-term disability, and 9    recidivism among this population.10        (6) States and jurisdictions across the U.S. have 11    created special laws or practices for emerging adults, 12    including extended juvenile jurisdiction, youthful 13    offender statutes, specialized probation units, young 14    adult courts, and correctional units tailored to this age 15    group.16        (7) Illinois has taken several important steps, 17    including youthful offender parole, the First Time Weapon 18    Offender Program, and the Cook County SEED Program, but it 19    has not comprehensively examined the full spectrum of 20    policies affecting emerging adults.21        (8) After decades of program based intervention 22    alternatives for juveniles, it is appropriate for the task 23    force to evaluate the efficiency of each of these programs 24    to ensure only those that are reducing criminal behavior 25    and providing for public safety and continues while those 26    that are not providing the expected benefits are phased   HB5434 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 16800 WRO 30209 b1    out.2        (9) Illinois would benefit from a comprehensive, 3    bipartisan, data-driven review of approaches to emerging 4    adults across the criminal justice system. 5    Section 10. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to create a 6bipartisan, bicameral Task Force to study and recommend 7strategies for developmentally appropriate, cost-effective, 8and equitable approaches to emerging adults in Illinois that 9provides opportunities for emerging adults to divert from the 10criminal justice system. 11    Section 15. Definitions. In this Act:12    "Department" means the Department of Corrections.13    "Emerging adult" means an individual who is 18 to 25 years 14of age.15    "Task Force" means the Task Force on Emerging Adults in 16the Criminal Justice System established under this Act. 17    Section 20. Establishment of Task Force. The Task Force on 18Emerging Adults in the Criminal Justice System is established 19within the Department and shall be provided staffing, 20research, and administrative support by the Department. 21    Section 25. Membership.22    (a) The Task Force shall be bipartisan, bicameral, and   HB5434 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 16800 WRO 30209 b1include representation from stakeholders in the criminal 2justice system, organizations that work extensively with young 3adults, and those with lived experience in the criminal 4justice system as emerging adults.5    (b) The Task Force shall consist of the following members:6        (1) two members of the Senate appointed by the 7    President of the Senate, one of whom shall be designated 8    as co-chair of the Task Force;9        (2) two members of the Senate appointed by the 10    Minority Leader of the Senate;11        (3) two members of the House appointed by the Speaker 12    of the House, one of whom shall be designated as co-chair 13    of the Task Force;14        (4) two members of the House appointed by the Minority 15    Leader of the House; and16        (5) the following members appointed by the Governor:17            (A) the Director of the Department or the 18        Director's designee; 19            (B) the Director of Juvenile Justice or the 20        Director's designee;21            (C) the Director of the Administrative Office of 22        the Illinois Courts or the Director's designee;23            (D) one circuit court judge with criminal or 24        problem-solving court experience; 25            (E) three State's Attorneys representing counties 26        of varying size;  HB5434 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 16800 WRO 30209 b1            (F) three Public Defenders representing counties 2        of varying size;3            (G) one representative of a statewide or regional 4        victims' rights organization;5            (H) two representatives of a municipal police 6        department;7            (I) two representatives of a sheriff's office that 8        operates a county jail;9            (J) two representatives of a community-based legal 10        services or holistic defense organization serving 11        emerging adults;12            (K) one representative of a community-based 13        organization that provides reentry services to 14        returning citizens, including emerging adults;15            (L) one representative of a community-based 16        organization providing education, workforce 17        development, housing, or behavioral health services to 18        emerging adults;19            (M) one representative of an employer association, 20        trade group, or major employer who regularly hires and 21        supervises young adults who are ages 18 to 25;22            (N) one administrator or faculty member from an 23        Illinois community college or public university with 24        expertise in student development or the behavior of 25        emerging adults;26            (O) one licensed mental health professional or   HB5434 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 16800 WRO 30209 b1        developmental psychologist with expertise in late 2        adolescence and emerging adulthood; 3            (P) two individuals with lived experience of 4        justice involvement for offenses committed between 5        ages 18 and 25, including at least one formerly 6        incarcerated in an adult facility;7            (Q) the Director of the Sentencing Policy Advisory 8        Committee;9            (R) a representative of an association that 10        represents attorneys statewide; and11            (S) a representative of a philanthropic 12        organization with expertise and experience in funding 13        services and policies for justice-involved emerging 14        adults.15    (c) Members shall serve without compensation but may be 16reimbursed for reasonable expenses subject to appropriation.17    (d) Vacancies shall be filled in the manner of original 18appointment.19    (e) Membership shall reflect, to the extent practicable, 20the demographic and geographic diversity of the State. 21    Section 30. Meetings; quorum; public input. The first 22meeting of the Task Force shall be held within 60 days after 23the appointment of a majority of its members. Meetings of the 24Task Force shall be called by the co-chairs. A majority of the 25members of the Task Force shall constitute a quorum. All   HB5434 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 16800 WRO 30209 b1meetings of the Task Force shall be subject to the Open 2Meetings Act. At least 3 public hearings of the Task Force 3shall be held in different regions of Illinois. 4    Section 35. Duties. The Task Force shall:5        (1) review Illinois law and practice affecting 6    emerging adults across pretrial, sentencing, corrections, 7    supervision, and reentry;8        (2) examine emerging adult models in other states and 9    jurisdictions, including the United Nations Standard 10    Minimum Rules for Non-custodial Measures and the United 11    Nations Standard Minimum Rules for the Administration of 12    Juvenile Justice;13        (3) integrate and summarize current developmental 14    research on emerging adults;15        (4) analyze racial, ethnic, gender, and geographic 16    disparities affecting emerging adults;17        (5) conduct benefit-cost and fiscal analyses of 18    current practices versus developmentally tailored 19    alternatives;20        (6) engage stakeholders, including crime survivors, 21    law enforcement organizations, employers, higher education 22    institutions, community organizations, and individuals 23    with lived experience with the criminal justice system;24        (7) develop recommendations for statutory, policy, and 25    programmatic improvements; and  HB5434 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 16800 WRO 30209 b1        (8) allow any Task Force member to prepare a written 2    dissent or statement of concern regarding any finding or 3    recommendation, which shall be included verbatim in all 4    interim and final reports. 5    Section 40. Reports.6    (a) No later than January 31, 2027, the Task Force shall 7submit an interim report to the Governor and the General 8Assembly summarizing its preliminary findings, analyses, and 9recommendations. The interim report shall include any written 10dissents or statements of concern submitted by Task Force 11members.12    (b) No later than December 1, 2027, the Task Force shall 13submit a final report to the Governor and the General 14Assembly, and the Department shall publish the report on its 15website. The final report shall include:16        (1) all final findings and recommendations;17        (2) draft statutory language, where appropriate;18        (3) estimated fiscal impacts and benefit-cost 19    analyses; and20        (4) all written dissents or statements of concern 21    submitted by any member, which shall be included in full 22    and published in the public version of the report.23    (c) Any member may submit a dissent or statement of 24concern up to 14 days following the adoption of any 25recommendation. The Department shall publish all dissenting   HB5434 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 16800 WRO 30209 b1statements alongside majority recommendations. 2    Section 45. Support; cooperation.3    (a) The Department shall provide staff support, research, 4data analysis, and administrative assistance to the Task 5Force.6    (b) State and local agencies shall cooperate with 7reasonable requests for data and information, consistent with 8all confidentiality laws. 9    Section 50. Repeal. This Act is repealed on June 30, 2028. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.